Utah, session 2026, HB504.
Section 1. Section 20A-11-1104 is amended to read:20A-11-1104. Disclosure of synthetic media.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments.(b)(i)"Creator" means a person that uses artificial intelligence to generate synthetic media.(ii)"Creator" does not include a person that solely provides the technology used in the creation of the synthetic media.(c)"Digital content provenance" means purely factual information that:(i)details a digital resource's creator, origin, context, history, and editing process; and(ii)conforms to an open industry technical standard.(d)"Generative artificial intelligence" means artificial intelligence technology that is capable of creating content such as text, audio, image, or video based on patterns learned from large volumes of data rather than being explicitly programmed with rules.(e)"Print communication" means a communication that is distributed in a physical, printed format, including a mailer, flyer, newspaper advertisement, magazine, handbill, or brochure.(e)(f)"Sponsor" means a person that pays for the content that uses artificial intelligence to generate synthetic media.(f)(g)"Synthetic audio media" means audio content that was substantially produced by generative artificial intelligence.(h)"Synthetic media" means:(i)synthetic audio media; or(ii)synthetic visual media.(g)(i)"Synthetic visual media" means an image or video that was substantially produced by generative artificial intelligence.(2)This section applies to an audio or visual communicationaudio, visual, or print communication that:(a)is paid for by a candidate campaign committee, political action committee, political issues committee, political party, or a person using a contribution; and(b)is intended to influence voting for or against a candidate or ballot proposition in an election or primary in the state; and.(c)contains synthetic media.(3)An audio communication described in Subsection (2) that contains synthetic audio media shall include audibly at the beginning and end of the communication the words,: "Contains content generated by AI."(4)A visual communication described in Subsection (2) that contains synthetic media shall display throughout the duration of each portion of the communication containing synthetic media, in legible writing, the words:(a)"This video content generated by AI," if the content is a video that includes synthetic visual media but not synthetic audio media;(b)"This image generated by AI," if the content is an image that includes synthetic visual media but not synthetic audio media;(c)"This audio content generated by AI," if the video includes synthetic audio media but not synthetic visual media; or(d)"This content generated by AI," if the communication includes both synthetic audio media and synthetic visual media.(5)A print communication described in Subsection (2) that contains synthetic visual media shall include, in a clear and conspicuous manner on the face of the communication, the words: "This advertisement includes visual content generated by AI."(5)(6)In addition to the requirements in Subsections (3) and (4), a creator or sponsor who publishes an online digital audio or visual communication described in Subsection (2) that is viewable, audible, or accessible in the state shall ensure the advertisement carries embedded tamper-evident digital content provenance that discloses:(a)the initial author and creator of the content;(b)any subsequent entities that edited, altered, or otherwise modified the content; and(c)any use of generative artificial intelligence in generating or modifying the substantive content.(6)(7)(a)In a civil action brought against the creator or the sponsor of content that includes synthetic media by a person to enforce this section, the court may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 against a person for each violation of this section that the court finds a person has committed.(b)Compliance with this section does not exempt a person from civil or criminal liability for violations of other applicable law.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.